troff/libhnj/hyphen.d/hyph_en_US.dic
v5enue
v5ole
va2n
va4ge
va5l2i4e4
va5mo
va5niz
va5pi
vac3u
vac5il
vag4
val1i
val1u
val5o
var1i
var2ie4
var5ied
ve4lo
ve4r1s2
ve4te
ve4ty
veg3
vel1l
vel3l2i
ven3om
ver1i
ver3ie4
ver3m4
ver3th
ver5enc
vermi4n
ves4te
vet3er
vi1o3l
vi1ou2
vi2al
vi3so
vi3su
vi5al1i
vi5gn
vi5ro
vil1i
vis3it
vit3r
vo1ra
vo2r5ab
vo4la
vo4ry
vo4ta
voi4
vom5i
vori4
w1b
w1er
w2a2r
w2ith3
w3ev
w3s2h
w4ind
w4ir4
w4k
w4no
w5ab2l2
w5al.
w5p
w5s4t
wa1te
wa2g5o
wa5ger
wa5ver
wai2
wait5
wam4
war4t
was4t
we2a2r
we4ath3
we4d4n4
wea2t
wea5r2ie4
wear1i
wee5v
weet3
wel4l
west3
whi4
wi2
wil1l
wil2
wil2l5in4
will2i
win4de
win4g
wiz5
wl3in
wl4es2
wo5v4en
wom1
wra4
wri1ta4
wri4
ws4l2
ws4pe
wy4
x1a
x1e
x1h
x1pa
x1t2
x1u
x2e5ro
x2ed
x2i5a
x2id
x2p2e3d
x3c2
x3i
x3o
x3p
x3ti
x4a2go
x4ap
x4ime
x4ob
xac5e
xam3
xas5
xe1cu
xe3c4ut
xe4cu1to
xer4i
xh4il5
xhi2
xhu4
xi5c
xi5di
xi5m2iz
xim1i
xp4an4d
xpa2n
xpe2c
xpe2c1t
xpec1to5
xu3a
xx4
y1b
y1c
y1co
y1d
y1er
y1i
y1o4
y1s3io
y1su
y1w
y2ce
y2p1t
y2ss4
y3ch
y3la
y3lo
y3po
y3ro
y3s2e
y3thin
y4er1f
y4m1b
y4m1p
y4o2n3s2
y4o5g
y4os
y4p2ed
y4po4c
y4so
y5ac
y5at
y5ee
y5gi
y5lu
y5pu
yc5er
ych4e2
ycom4
ycot4
ye4t
yes4
yl1l
ylla5b2l2
ym1pa3
ymbol5
yme4
yn2ch
yn3c4hr4
yn5d
yn5g
yn5ic
yo2n
yo5d
yo5net
yom4
yp2ta
yp3i
yper5
yr4r4
yr5i3a
yra5m
ys1t
ys3i1ca
ys3ta
ys4c
ysu2r4
yt3ic
z1er
z2a2r2
z2e3ro
z4il
z4is
z4zy
z5a2b
za1
ze4n
ze4p
zet4
zo4m
zo5ol
zoo2
zte4
